New York, session 2025-2026, A7580.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-17) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-17) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied as a school, church, synagogue or other 8 place of worship, provided such premises constitute a premises for the 9 sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 10 located wholly within the boundaries of the county of Orange in the city 11 of Middletown, bounded and described as follows: 12 Schedule C 13 All that certain plot, piece or parcel of land situate, lying and 14 being in the City of Middletown, County of Orange and State of New York, 15 bounded and described as follows: 16 BEGINNING at a point on the southeasterly side of North Street, said 17 point being the southwesterly corner of lands now or formerly of DeGraw 18 Equity (liber 5208 page 260); 19 THENCE South 59 degrees 45 minutes 09 seconds East, a distance of 20 104.24 feet passing through a party wall and along the lands now or 21 formerly DeGraw Equity (liber 5208 page 260) to a building corner; 22 THENCE along the lands now or formerly Glendening (liber 4778 pages 23 277 & 281) the following three (3) courses and distances: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10682-01-5 A. 7580 2 1 1. South 59 degrees 42 minutes 20 seconds East, a distance of 30.00 2 feet; 3 2. South 30 degrees 47 minutes 00 seconds West, a distance of 23.89 4 feet; 5 3. South 34 degrees 37 minutes 40 seconds East, a distance of 26.38 6 feet to a building corner; 7 THENCE South 30 degrees 47 minutes 00 seconds West, a distance of 8 51.08 feet along the lands now or formerly Glendening (liber 4778 page 9 261) and Foley (liber 2334 page 295) to a point; 10 THENCE along the lands now or formerly Foley (liber 2334 page 295) the 11 following four (4) courses and distances: 12 1. North 61 degrees 09 minutes 30 seconds West, a distance of 60.00 13 feet; 14 2. North 82 degrees 02 minutes 01 seconds West, a distance of 20.03 15 feet; 16 3. South 30 degrees 46 minutes 54 seconds West, a distance of 0.94 17 feet; 18 4. North 59 degrees 50 minutes 59 seconds West, a distance of 84.24 19 feet passing through a party wall to a point; 20 THENCE North 30 degrees 47 minutes 04 seconds East, a distance of 21 89.54 feet along the southeasterly side of North Street to the point or 22 place of BEGINNING. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.